src/morphology/stems/fin-acronyms.lexc
!!  !!!Acronym classification
!!  Acronyms are shortenings that inflect. They all have two inflection
!!  patterns, one read letter by letter, and one word-by-word. They are separate
!!  entries in this dictionary. For example OY will have singular illatives
!!  _OY:hyn_ and _OY:öön_ for _yyhyn_ and _yhtiöön_ resp., although latter is
!!  much rarer.
!!
!!  A big majority of popular acronyms in everyday use comes from English, and
!!  the word-based inflection is virtually non-existent and would be very
!!  confusing so there's no high priority for adding that.

LEXICON ACRO_AA

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_HAN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_CELSIUS

:  ACRO_KUUSI  ;


LEXICON ACRO_DOLLARI

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_EE

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;


LEXICON ACRO_EURO

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_GRAMMA

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_GRAY

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;


LEXICON ACRO_II

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;


LEXICON ACRO_JOULE

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_JÄRJESTÖ

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT  ;


LEXICON ACRO_KAHDEKSAN

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_KAKSI

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_KANDELA

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_KOLMAS

:  ACRO_KUUSI  ;


LEXICON ACRO_KOLME

:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_KUUSI

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_LEHTI

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT  ;


LEXICON ACRO_LUSIKKA

:  ACRO_SAIRAALA  ;


LEXICON ACRO_METRI

:  ACRO_SENTTI  ;


LEXICON ACRO_NELJÄ

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT  ;


LEXICON ACRO_NOLLA

:  ACRO_KAHDEKSAN  ;


LEXICON ACRO_OHMI

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;

:%:e  ACRO_BACK_PLURALS  ;


LEXICON ACRO_OIKEUS

:  ACRO_KUUSI  ;


LEXICON ACRO_OK

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_OO

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_OPISTO

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_OPPILAS

:  ACRO_TUOTE  ;


LEXICON ACRO_PUNTA

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_PYKÄLÄ

:  ACRO_NELJÄ  ;


LEXICON ACRO_SAIRAALA

:%:  ACRO_BACK_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_BACK_CLIT  ;

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM  ;


LEXICON ACRO_SEITSEMÄN

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT  ;


LEXICON ACRO_SENTTI

:  ACRO_COMPOUND  ;
:  ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM  ;

:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CASES  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_POSS  ;
:%:  ACRO_FRONT_CLIT  ;

:%:e  ACRO_FRONT_PLURALS  ;


LEXICON ACRO_TALO

:  ACRO_EURO  ;

LEXICON ACRONYM
A4+ACR:A4  ACRO_NELJÄ  ;
AGEA+ACR:AGEA  ACRO_SAIRAALA  ;
Air1%0%0+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Air100  ACRO_NOLLA  ;
AL+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:AL  ACRO_LEHTI  ;
Aleksi% 13+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Aleksi% 13   ACRO_KOLME  ;
ASEAN+3+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:ASEAN+3  ACRO_KOLME  ;
Can$+ACR:Can$  ACRO_DOLLARI  ;
CIA+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:CIA  ACRO_AA  ;
CIPD+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:CIPD  ACRO_EE  ;
cmol+ACR:cmol  ACRO_OHMI  ;
CV+ACR:CV  ACRO_GRAY  ;
dag+ACR:dag  ACRO_GRAMMA  ;
daJ+ACR:daJ  ACRO_JOULE  ;
dcd+ACR:dcd  ACRO_KANDELA  ;
dj+ACR:dj  ACRO_II  ;
DRAM+ACR:DRAM  ACRO_DOLLARI  ;
E+ACR:E  ACRO_PUNTA  ;
EAN+ACR:EAN  ACRO_TALO  ;
E°C+ACR:E°C  ACRO_CELSIUS  ;
ETK+ACR:ETK  ACRO_OHMI  ;
ETLA+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:ETLA  ACRO_AA  ;
ETY+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:ETY  ACRO_JÄRJESTÖ  ;
EU% 27+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:EU% 27   ACRO_SEITSEMÄN  ;
EU27+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:EU27  ACRO_SEITSEMÄN  ;
fGy+ACR:fGy  ACRO_GRAY  ;
FI+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Geo:FI  ACRO_II  ;
FIT+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:FIT  ACRO_EE  ;
fl+ACR:fl  ACRO_GRAMMA  ;
flx+ACR:flx  ACRO_METRI  ;
Forum% 18+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Forum% 18 ACRO_KAHDEKSAN  ;
G2%0+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:G20  ACRO_NOLLA  ;
G77+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:G77  ACRO_SEITSEMÄN  ;
G8+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:G8  ACRO_KAHDEKSAN  ;
Gcd+ACR:Gcd  ACRO_KANDELA  ;
GJ+ACR:GJ  ACRO_JOULE  ;
GMO+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:GMO  ACRO_OO  ;
hGy+ACR:hGy  ACRO_GRAY  ;
HL+ACR:HL  ACRO_PUNTA  ;
HO+ACR:HO  ACRO_OIKEUS  ;
Hollolan% Urheilijat% -46+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Hollolan% Urheilijat% -46  ACRO_KUUSI  ;
HYKS+ACR:HYKS  ACRO_SAIRAALA  ;
IL+ACR:IL  ACRO_LEHTI  ;
IS+ACR:IS  ACRO_PUNTA  ;
ISJ+ACR:ISJ  ACRO_II  ;
JoY+ACR:JoY  ACRO_JÄRJESTÖ  ;
JSW+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:JSW  ACRO_EE  ;
K12+ACR:K12  ACRO_KAKSI  ;
K16+ACR:K16  ACRO_KUUSI  ;
K18+ACR:K18  ACRO_KAHDEKSAN  ;
k°C+ACR:k°C  ACRO_CELSIUS  ;
kcd+ACR:kcd  ACRO_KANDELA  ;
KELA+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:KELA  ACRO_AA  ;
Kenttäurheilijat-58+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Kenttäurheilijat-58  ACRO_KAHDEKSAN  ;
Keravan% Kori-8%0+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Keravan% Kori-80  ACRO_NOLLA  ;
KKO+ACR:KKO  ACRO_OIKEUS  ;
kko+ACR:kko  ACRO_TALO  ;
KOK+ACR:KOK  ACRO_OIKEUS  ;
KRH+ACR:KRH  ACRO_OO  ;
Kustaa% III+ACR:Kustaa% III ACRO_KOLMAS  ;
L2+ACR:L2  ACRO_KAKSI  ;
l+ACR:l  ACRO_GRAMMA  ;
Lahden% Suunnistajat% -37+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Lahden% Suunnistajat% -37  ACRO_SEITSEMÄN  ;
LaT+ACR:LaT  ACRO_DOLLARI  ;
m³+ACR:m³  ACRO_METRI  ;
m€+ACR:m€  ACRO_EURO  ;
M€+ACR:M€  ACRO_EURO  ;
MAI+ACR:MAI  ACRO_II  ;
Mainostoimisto% 96+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Mainostoimisto% 96   ACRO_KUUSI  ;
mGy+ACR:mGy  ACRO_GRAY  ;
mJ+ACR:mJ  ACRO_JOULE  ;
mp3+ACR:mp3  ACRO_KOLME  ;
MP3+N:MP3  ACRO_KOLME  ;
MTV3+N:MTV3  ACRO_KOLME  ; !!= * {{@CODE@}} Mainos-Tele-Visio
MuT+ACR:MuT  ACRO_EE  ;
MV+ACR:MV  ACRO_OHMI  ;
O2+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:O2  ACRO_KAKSI  ;
o+ACR:o  ACRO_OO  ;
OAJ+ACR:OAJ  ACRO_JÄRJESTÖ  ;
OK+ACR:OK  ACRO_OK  ;
OSMA+ACR:OSMA  ACRO_AA  ;
OY+ACR:OY  ACRO_OPISTO  ;
p°C+ACR:p°C  ACRO_CELSIUS  ;
pcd+ACR:pcd  ACRO_KANDELA  ;
Phillips% 66+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Phillips% 66   ACRO_KUUSI  ;
PJ+ACR:PJ  ACRO_II  ;
PJ+ACR:PJ  ACRO_JOULE  ;
PK+ACR:PK  ACRO_METRI  ;
pT+ACR:pT  ACRO_GRAMMA  ;
rkl+ACR:rkl  ACRO_LUSIKKA  ;
SAK+ACR:SAK  ACRO_JÄRJESTÖ  ;
Seat24+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Seat24  ACRO_NELJÄ  ;
SETA+ACR:SETA  ACRO_TALO  ;
SI$+ACR:SI$  ACRO_DOLLARI  ;
SK+ACR:SK  ACRO_LEHTI  ;
STTK+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:STTK  ACRO_OO  ;
Suomi24+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Suomi24  ACRO_NELJÄ  ;
TELA+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:TELA  ACRO_AA  ;
Tele2+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Tele2  ACRO_KAKSI  ;
TGC-1%0+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:TGC-10  ACRO_NOLLA  ;
TI+N:TI  ACRO_II  ;    !!= * {{@CODE@}} Texas Instruments
tlk+ACR:tlk  ACRO_LUSIKKA  ;
Tornion% Lentis% –88+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:Tornion% Lentis% –88    ACRO_KAHDEKSAN  ;
TTY+ACR:TTY  ACRO_JÄRJESTÖ  ;
tv+ACR:tv  ACRO_EE  ;
tvt+ACR:tvt  ACRO_LUSIKKA  ;
VG-62+ACR+Prop+Sem%/Org:VG-62  ACRO_KAKSI  ;
vpk+ACR:vpk  ACRO_PUNTA  ;
VTT+ACR:VTT  ACRO_CELSIUS  ;
yGy+ACR:yGy  ACRO_GRAY  ;
yo+ACR:yo  ACRO_OPPILAS  ;
ys+ACR:ys  ACRO_METRI  ;
YT+ACR:YT  ACRO_OK  ;
Z°C+ACR:Z°C  ACRO_CELSIUS  ;
zJ+ACR:zJ  ACRO_JOULE  ;
zmol+ACR:zmol  ACRO_OHMI  ;
Zrad+ACR:Zrad  ACRO_DOLLARI  ;
zT+ACR:zT  ACRO_GRAMMA  ;
ÄOL+ACR:ÄOL  ACRO_TALO  ;
μcd+ACR:μcd  ACRO_KANDELA  ;
